Connecticut, session 2026, HB05132.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to exempt from the
sales and use taxes the sale of and the storage, use or other consumption
in this state of machinery and equipment used in the process of coloring
or mixing paint and used by retailers that offer paint for sale at retail in
this state.